Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1120.23
Communications
Cash Fund; established; purpose; investment.

There
is hereby established a cash fund to be known as the Communications Cash Fund.
Appropriations made to the division of communications of the office of Chief
Information Officer for the purposes of sections 81-1120.01 to 81-1120.28
shall be credited to the fund. All funds received under such sections and
all funds received for communications services provided to any agency, department,
or other user shall be credited to the fund. The division shall, under policies
and procedures established by the director, expend funds from time to time
credited to the fund for the communications purposes enumerated in such sections.
Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of
the Legislature. Any money in the Communications Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. On July 1, 2011, or as soon thereafter
as is administratively possible, the State Treasurer shall transfer any money
in the Communications Cash Fund to the Communications Revolving Fund. On July
31, 2011, the Communications Cash Fund shall terminate.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 9, p. 1883;

Laws 1971, LB 675, § 6;

Laws 1973, LB 431, § 2;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1120.09;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 14;

Laws 1984, LB 1125, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 24;

Laws 1992, LB 858, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 103;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 9;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 71;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 28.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.